Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 31 Medal of Honor Recipients

30-31-1.
Declaration of purpose.

The legislature hereby finds and declares:

Numerous Rhode Island residents have distinguished themselves in the armed services of the United States by gallantry above and beyond the call of duty;

That as a result of that gallantry, these residents have been awarded the medal of honor by the President of the United States;

That the proper method of furthering that goal would be the establishment of a permanent committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 338, § 1.

30-31-2.
Creation of committee — Members — Vacancies.

There is hereby created a permanent committee on Rhode Island medal of honor recipients to consist of nine (9) members of the general public with knowledge of veterans’ affairs to be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate; provided, however, that:

Those members of the committee as of the effective date of this act [March 29, 2006], who were appointed to the committee by members of the general assembly, shall cease to be members of the committee on the effective date of this act [March 29, 2006] and the governor shall nominate six (6) new members, each of whom shall serve for the balance of the current term of his or her predecessor.

Those members of the committee as of the effective date of this act [March 29, 2006], who were appointed to the committee by the governor, shall continue to serve for the duration of their current terms.

No person shall be eligible for appointment to the committee unless he or she is a resident of this state. Vacancies shall be filled in like manner as the original appointments. Members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. The members of the committee shall be eligible to succeed themselves.

No person shall be eligible for appointment to the committee after the effective date of this act [March 29, 2006] unless he or she is a resident of this state.

Members of the committee shall be removable by the governor pursuant to the provisions of §

36-1-7

and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan of personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 64; P.L. 2006, ch. 14, § 6; P.L. 2006, ch. 16, § 6.

30-31-3.
Selection of officers.

Upon organization of the committee, by majority vote, one of its members shall be chosen as chairperson, another of its members shall be chosen vice chairperson, and another of its members shall be chosen as secretary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 327, § 1.

30-31-4.
Duties.

It shall be the duty of the committee to coordinate the activities of veterans’ organizations and other parties interested in veterans’ affairs in order to decide upon a suitable monument or monuments to be placed on the site described in §

30-31-1(3)

. The committee is hereby empowered to determine the type of monument or monuments to be placed on that site and it shall be the exclusive responsibility of the committee to arrange for the placing of a monument or monuments and to maintain the grounds surrounding the monument.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the committee shall approve and submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, including meeting minutes, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds and a summary of any clerical, administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to the provisions of this section; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically on the general assembly and secretary of state’s websites as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this subsection.

The committee shall conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the chair of the committee, approved by the committee, and conducted by the chair of the committee. The committee may approve the use of any committee or staff members or other individuals to assist with training. The training course shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapters 46 of title 42, 14 of title 36, and 2 of title 38 and the committee’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act [March 29, 2006], prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapters 46 of title 42, 14 of title 36, and 2 of title 38.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 14, § 6; P.L. 2006, ch. 16, § 6.

30-31-5.
Technical assistance.

The joint committee shall, if it finds it cannot obtain the proper assistance from available sources, contract for such technical services as it shall require to effectuate its purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 327, § 1.

30-31-6.
Place of meeting — Quorum.

The joint committee on legislative services shall provide adequate space in the state house for the use of the committee; provided, however, that the committee may conduct hearings and hold meetings elsewhere when doing so will better serve its purposes. A majority in number of the committee shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 327, § 1.